New Jersey, session 221, S1225.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A CATV company shall not advertise its price for CATV service to a consumer in this State unless the advertised price is the total billable amount that the CATV company will charge to a consumer for the provision of CATV service based on the minimum equipment necessary per television set to receive and operate the CATV service that is being advertised. b.    A price advertised to a consumer shall include, but not be limited to, any broadcast programming fee, administrative and service fee, regional sports network fee, or cable television equipment fee per television set, including set-top box and remote rental fee. c.     The provisions of subsection a. of this section shall not require a CATV company to include in its advertised price for CATV service to a consumer in this State any tax, fee, or other charge that, pursuant to federal or State law, the CATV company is required to charge to a consumer and, pursuant to federal law, may itemize on a bill for CATV service; however, a CATV company shall indicate with its advertised price to consumers that federal or State taxes, fees, or other charges may apply. 2.   a. A direct broadcast satellite service company or television streaming service company doing business in this State shall not advertise a price for television service to a consumer in this State unless the advertised price is the total billable amount that the company will charge to a consumer for the provision of the television service based on the minimum equipment necessary per television set to receive and operate the service that is being advertised. b.   A price advertised to a consumer shall include, but not be limited to, any broadcast programming fee, administrative and service fee, regional sports network fee, or television equipment fee per television set, including set-top box and remote rental fee, if applicable. c.   The provisions of subsection a. of this section shall not require a direct broadcast satellite service company or a television streaming service company to include in its advertised price for television service to a consumer in this State any tax, fee, or other charge that, pursuant to federal or State law, the company is required to charge to a consumer and, pursuant to federal law, may itemize on a bill for service; however, a direct broadcast satellite service company or a television streaming service company shall indicate with its advertised price to consumers that federal or State taxes, fees, or other charges may apply. d.   As used in this section: Direct broadcast satellite service shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1 of P.L.2019, c.188 (C.56:12-99). Television streaming service means a service that transmits over the Internet video content that is played continuously without download and whose provider charges a fee to consumers in this State. 3.    A violation of section 2 of P.L.    , c.      (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be an unlawful practice and violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). 4.    This act shall take effect immediately, but shall remain inoperative for 60 days following the date of enactment.